Hawaii statutes.
§431:20-108 Guarantee fund. (a) A
title insurer, before issuing any title insurance policy covering property
located in this State, shall deposit $400,000 with the commissioner, which
deposit shall be known as a guarantee fund and shall be held for the security
and protection of the holders or beneficiaries under its title insurance
policies.

(b) The deposit required under subsection (a)
may be made in lawful money of the United States or in the securities
authorized for investment by domestic incorporated insurers under article 6 of
this code.

(c) Assets deposited pursuant to subsection
(a), with the commissioner's approval, may be exchanged from time to time for
other assets that qualify under subsection (b).

(d) The depositing title insurer shall receive
the income, interests, and dividends on any assets deposited.

(e) A title insurer that has deposited assets
pursuant to this section, with the approval of the commissioner, may withdraw
any part of the assets so deposited. If a title insurer continues to engage in
the business of title insurance, it shall not be permitted to withdraw assets
that would reduce the amount of its deposits below the amount required by
subsection (a).

(f) In the event of the insolvency or
dissolution of a title insurer, the deposit made pursuant to this section shall
be retained by the commissioner until the time all outstanding liabilities
created by the title insurance policies issued or reinsurance assumed by the
title insurer have been discharged by reinsurance or otherwise. As much of the
deposit as shall be necessary may be used by or with the written approval of
the commissioner in the payment of claims arising under the title insurance
policies or reinsurance assumed or to purchase reinsurance thereon. Any amounts
then remaining shall be applied first to the payment of other obligations of
the title insurer, and second, shall be distributed to the stockholders of the
title insurer.

(g) In lieu of a deposit maintained in this
State, the commissioner shall accept the certificate in proper form of the
public officer having general supervision of insurers in any other state to the
effect that a deposit, in a like amount, by the insurer is being maintained for
like purposes in public custody or control pursuant to the laws of that state.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2 as superseded by c 348, §22]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next